Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 12-609, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 12-609. A. In addition to other requirements
prescribed by this chapter, by federal law or by local ordinance,
all motorcycles, except when operated on actual trail rides
conducted outside of public roads and highways, shall be equipped
with:
1. Two rearview mirrors, containing a reflection surface of not
less than three (3) inches in diameter, mounted one on each side of
the motorcycle and positioned so as to enable the operator to
clearly view the roadway to the rear of the vehicle;
2. A windshield of sufficient quality, size and thickness to
protect the operator from foreign objects, except that in lieu of
such windshield, the operator shall wear goggles or other protective
eyewear which meets American National Standards Institute (ANSI)
Standard Z87.1 and provides positive retention, or a face shield of
material and design to protect the operator from foreign objects;

3. A properly operating speedometer capable of registering at
least the maximum legal speed limit for that motorcycle;
4. A fender over each wheel. All fenders shall be of the type
provided by the manufacturer;
5. A horn which shall comply with the requirements of Section
12-401 of this title; and
6. A muffler or other effective noise-suppressing system which
shall comply with the requirements of Section 12-402 of this title.
B. No person under eighteen (18) years of age shall operate or
ride upon any motorcycle unless such person is properly wearing a
crash helmet of a type which complies with standards established by
49 C.F.R., Section 571.218.
C. Handlebars on motorcycles shall not be higher than eye level
of the operator.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1021 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1021 Page 3